Nevada, session 83, SB501.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Expenditure of the following sums not appropriated
from the State General Fund or the State Highway Fund is hereby
authorized during Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-
2027 by the various officers, departments, boards, agencies,
commissions and institutions of the State Government mentioned in
this act:
2025-2026 2026-2027
Governor’s Office:
Agency for Nuclear Projects $550,000 $550,000
Washington Office 240,000 240,000
COVID-19 Relief Programs 620,831,650 154,722,297
Nevada Athletic Commission 7,114,594 7,124,052
Office of Energy 20,615,055 18,037,883
Account for Renewable
Energy, Energy Efficiency
and Energy Conservation 1,598,570 1,820,960
Renewable Energy Account 20,697,293 19,959,266
Office of Science, Innovation
and Technology 582,234,593 134,487,632
Office of Finance – Budget
Division 1,208,440 943,282
Client Services Division 16,139,448 16,322,545
Governor’s Technology
Office - Director’s Office 4,544,122 4,934,671
Computing Services Division 35,661,397 38,032,803
Network Services Division 8,018,926 7,659,656
Unified Communications Unit 4,676,924 5,658,677
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Network Transport Services
Unit $5,570,435 $5,627,848
Office of Information Security 4,732,575 5,084,476
Office of Emergency
Management 7,154,568 7,406,764
Emergency Management
Assistance Grants 30,643,692 30,883,251
Homeland Security 432,820 433,346
Commission on Ethics:
Commission on Ethics $1,523,086 $1,237,489
Attorney General’s Office:
Office of the Extradition
Coordinator $63,641 $63,641
Attorney General
Administration 39,064,156 39,766,072
Special Litigation Account 822,505 819,437
Workers’ Compensation Fraud 3,803,842 3,362,708
Crime Prevention 26,274 26,274
Medicaid Fraud Control Unit 3,573,705 3,128,142
Consumer’s Advocate 6,453,652 6,710,630
Grants Unit 10,514,534 9,950,129
Advisory Council for
Prosecuting Attorneys 53,750 17,833
Victims of Domestic Violence 284,241 288,498
Attorney General Tort Claims
Fund 7,759,530 9,020,813
State Settlements 1,504,442 1,504,441
Consumer Protection Legal
Account 17,285,731 15,160,736
Investigations Unit 7,116,209 7,130,097
Office of the State Controller:
Controller’s Office $892,946 $484,023
Debt Recovery Account 744,161 815,094
Office of the Secretary of State:
Secretary of State $538,150 $543,280
Help America Vote Act 3,176,502 3,332,602
Office of the State Treasurer:
State Treasurer $4,872,338 $4,967,581
Higher Education Tuition
Administration 1,027,704 1,056,984
Bond Interest and Redemption 715,514,507 843,380,202
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Municipal Bond Bank
Revenue $2,568,031 $5,136,556
Municipal Bond Bank Debt
Service 2,607,712 5,176,237
Millennium Scholarship
Administration 1,412,679 776,834
Nevada College Savings Trust 2,812,191 2,833,668
Endowment Account 27,211,045 30,880,924
Unclaimed Property 5,412,105 4,813,750
Nevada State Infrastructure
Bank 389,007 396,107
Health Care Student Loan
Repayment 7,479,769 8,872,989
Nevada Employee Savings
Trust Administration 64,000 108,000
Department of Administration:
Director’s Office $1,155,240 $1,243,650
Committee to Administer the
Public Employees’
Program Deferred
Compensation Program 698,856 710,303
Hearings Division 8,419,677 8,483,106
Insurance and Loss Prevention 47,712,925 46,682,842
Fleet Services Division 9,410,940 9,169,497
Fleet Services Capital
Purchase 702,088 942,590
Purchasing Division 8,158,322 6,214,042
Federal Surplus Property
Program 117,841 136,766
State Public Works
Division – Administration 1,288,925 1,286,718
State Public Works
Division – Buildings and
Grounds 39,288,662 39,995,489
State Public Works Division –
Engineering and Planning 14,088,295 14,071,137
State Public Works Division –
Marlette Lake 1,842,175 1,639,060
State Unemployment
Compensation 2,556,528 2,103,312
Division of Human Resource
Management 13,437,508 12,677,503
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Agency HR Services $2,018,712 $1,920,513
Administrative Services
Division 5,357,618 5,647,564
State Library 2,063,084 2,081,415
State Library – Archives and
Public Records 14,880 14,880
State Library – Library
Cooperative 812,468 700,082
State Library – IPS
Equipment/Software 24,266 31,846
Mail Services Division 12,235,145 12,900,838
Mail Services Equipment 235,786 264,315
Supreme Court of Nevada:
Judicial Department Staff
Salaries $197,869 $196,955
Administrative Office of the
Courts 6,853,004 3,172,555
Judicial Support, Governance
and Special Events 1,029,163 1,158,881
Supreme Court 47,450 47,450
Specialty Courts 2,049,470 1,961,046
Senior Justice and Senior
Judge Program 38,050 38,050
Supreme Court Law Library 325 325
Department of Tourism and Cultural Affairs:
Cultural Affairs
Administration $54,230,529 $49,858,564
Division of Tourism 26,780,805 26,360,135
Destination Development 1,877,941 1,892,825
Museums and History
Administration 771,065 772,194
Lost City Museum 653,287 644,801
Nevada Historical Society 1,119,437 842,604
Nevada State Museum, Carson
City 2,195,160 2,224,364
Nevada State Museum Las
Vegas 2,032,385 1,975,685
Nevada State Railroad
Museums 2,022,165 2,211,488
Nevada Arts Council 2,996,620 2,768,815
Department of Native American Affairs:
Nevada Indian Commission $4,960,532 $880,445
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Stewart Indian School Living
Legacy $368,582 $373,147
Governor’s Office of Economic Development:
Office of Economic
Development $325,197 $325,197
Nevada Film Office 723,332 717,423
Rural Community
Development 3,402,263 3,408,310
Procurement Outreach
Program 617,740 617,753
Nevada SSBCI Program 73,323,781 55,360,128
Knowledge Account 1,994,429 2,047,777
Small Business Enterprise
Loan Account 158,000 158,000
Department of Taxation:
Department of Taxation $4,367,319 $1,271,678
Legislative Counsel Bureau:
Legislative Counsel Bureau $1,923,623 $2,422,455
State Printing Office 3,588,935 3,518,078
Peace Officers’ Standards and Training Commission:
Peace Officers’ Standards and
Training Commission $35,962 $35,962
Department of Veterans Services:
Department of Veterans
Services $4,468,076 $4,802,877
Southern Nevada Veterans
Home Account 56,460,166 64,121,099
Northern Nevada Veterans
Home Account 25,668,831 26,026,895
Cannabis Compliance Board:
Marijuana Regulation and
Control Account $39,996,743 $39,294,206
Department of Education:
Career and Technical
Education $14,290,151 $14,290,709
Account for Alternative
Schools 5,338 5,338
Educator Licensure 5,207,025 4,782,859
Office of Early Learning and
Development 16,083,407 6,591,980
Student and School Support 183,231,233 183,149,525
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act $90,938,113 $90,870,176
District Support Services 1,302,452 1,310,364
Department Support Services 6,104,292 5,421,554
Data Systems Management 1,983,299 1,501,239
Standards and Instructional
Support 472,949 473,322
Educator Effectiveness 15,356,171 15,351,608
Assessments and
Accountability 4,987,744 4,930,351
Safe and Respectful Learning 4,356,751 1,077,221
Office of the Superintendent 1,000 1,000
GEAR UP 3,500,000 3,500,000
COVID-19 Funding 5,749,679 0
Continuing Education 8,153,140 8,153,140
State Public Charter School Authority:
State Public Charter School
Authority $50,256,350 $50,708,477
Public Charter School Loan
Program 731,934 848,184
Nevada System of Higher Education:
University of Nevada, Reno $119,813,215 $126,048,682
UNR - School of Medicine 36,097,083 36,219,677
System Administration 226,344 226,344
University of Nevada, Las
Vegas 165,819,452 175,798,781
UNLV - School of Medicine 5,794,606 6,097,297
Agricultural Experiment
Station 2,597,127 2,597,127
Cooperative Extension Service 2,158,463 2,181,007
Trust Account for the
Education of Dependent
Children 74,584 75,084
UNLV Law School 7,196,842 7,570,579
Great Basin College 5,514,706 5,779,639
UNLV Dental School 9,634,779 10,122,400
Nevada State University 15,348,119 16,457,119
College of Southern Nevada 49,262,515 52,091,327
Western Nevada College 5,187,457 5,291,206
Truckee Meadows Community
College 15,549,698 16,373,802
Prison Education Program 182,169 187,650
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Performance Funding Pool $225,307 $225,307
Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education:
Loans and Stipends $97,294 $80,851
Department of Human Services:
Human Services
Administration $1,121,605 $1,110,542
Grants Management Unit 29,369,861 26,658,674
Upper Payment Limit Holding
Account 11,383,074 11,476,196
Grief Support Trust Account 165,116 168,999
Fund for a Resilient Nevada 105,510,023 77,504,762
Division of Public and Behavioral Health:
Behavioral Health:
Southern Nevada Adult
Mental Health Services $22,068,282 $11,386,333
Northern Nevada Adult
Mental Health Services 2,531,132 2,635,679
Crisis Response 36,771,885 41,356,954
Behavioral Health
Administration 5,222,979 5,513,428
Behavioral Health
Prevention and Treatment 58,348,719 54,638,332
Alcohol Tax Program 2,156,868 2,702,033
Lake’s Crossing Center 1,160,955 1,159,955
Rural Clinics 3,477,743 3,479,437
Public Health:
Radiation Control $8,309,908 $7,593,484
Low-Level Radioactive
Waste Fund 1,508,231 1,437,485
Nevada Central Cancer
Registry 1,270,778 1,297,761
Health Statistics and
Planning 5,209,620 4,744,921
Immunization Program 7,128,425 7,318,772
WIC Food Supplement 73,879,493 73,951,079
Communicable Diseases 43,757,988 37,421,215
Public Health Preparedness
Program 14,461,812 14,491,409
Chronic Disease 13,589,093 13,593,509
Health Investigations and
Epidemiology 25,098,925 21,106,593
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Maternal, Child and
Adolescent Health Services $10,151,559 $9,122,432
Office of Health
Administration 16,500,941 16,719,967
Community Health
Services 2,763,805 2,232,844
Emergency Medical
Services 1,702,716 1,689,807
Marijuana Health Registry 3,488,598 3,497,365
Public Health
Improvements 14,897,570 10,036,238
Division of Social Services:
Child Care Services $3,714,064 $3,856,622
Welfare Administration 122,986,413 110,168,625
Temporary Assistance for
Needy Families 19,633,209 19,636,616
Welfare Field Services 136,539,680 139,640,574
Child Support Enforcement
Program 19,959,240 20,462,325
Child Support Federal
Reimbursement 31,052,588 31,044,116
Welfare – Child Assistance
and Development 115,411,763 106,621,330
Welfare – Energy Assistance
Program 22,976,572 21,743,896
Aging and Disability Services Division:
Tobacco Settlement Program $6,399,538 $6,408,584
Administration 14,677,945 11,760,504
Senior Rx and Disability Rx 323,772 314,122
Home- and Community-Based
Services 6,614,186 6,698,217
Family Preservation Program 1,134,463 1,134,951
Rural Regional Center 17,108,497 17,229,227
FOCIS and MFP 2,686,800 2,732,237
Planning, Advocacy and
Community Grants 16,138,514 11,627,462
Desert Regional Center 137,570,233 132,224,026
Sierra Regional Center 44,791,720 44,897,556
Adult Protective Services and
Long-Term Care 3,237,993 3,225,020
State Independent Living
Council 427,053 422,372
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Early Intervention Services $7,043,915 $6,823,625
Autism Treatment Assistance
Program 3,587,196 3,626,931
Communication Access
Services 11,066,903 12,193,365
Consumer Health Assistance 1,225,149 1,303,699
Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act Part C
Compliance 4,665,851 4,665,851
Division of Child and Family Services:
Community Juvenile Justice
Services $1,061,420 $1,062,537
Washoe County Child Welfare 21,309,106 21,287,434
Clark County Child Welfare 67,422,992 69,014,867
Information Services 26,114,315 15,194,217
Children, Youth and Family
Administration 7,831,188 7,944,754
Family Support Program 10,996,372 10,701,232
Youth Alternative Placement 2,557,866 2,698,940
Caliente Youth Center 271,502 271,502
Victims of Domestic Violence 5,836,304 5,878,947
Rural Child Welfare 18,102,988 18,680,001
Trust Fund for Child Welfare 553,732 703,281
Children’s Trust Account 1,008,798 951,422
Transition from Foster Care 888,355 939,341
Review of Death of Children
Account 329,464 268,655
Nevada Youth Training Center 354,880 354,880
Summit View Youth Center 290,670 294,787
Youth Parole Services 4,549,003 4,560,969
Northern Nevada Child and
Adolescent Services 7,482,965 7,473,170
Southern Nevada Child and
Adolescent Services 21,922,346 22,218,896
Victims Services 14,508,924 13,958,499
Victims of Crime 2,918,804 2,918,804
Nevada Health Authority:
Intergovernmental Transfer
Program $198,170,080 $200,898,223
Increased Quality of Nursing
Care 54,301,678 55,972,494
Medicaid Administration 219,620,310 237,969,978
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Account to Improve Health
Care Quality and Access $484,130,805 $508,274,484
Nevada Check-Up Program 71,007,245 75,621,161
Nevada Medicaid 6,149,660,930 6,495,988,105
Prescription Drug Rebate 484,764,734 497,264,734
Developmental Disabilities 658,964 658,964
Indigent Hospital Care 86,232,894 86,641,699
Data Analytics 3,344,470 3,419,653
Health Care Facilities
Regulation 22,333,470 22,089,431
Health Care Facilities
Administrative Penalty 333,939 392,494
Public Option 103,293 200,110
Public Employees’ Benefits Program:
Public Employees’ Benefits
Program $712,029,932 $774,250,197
Retired Employees’ Group
Insurance 71,531,220 71,555,773
Active Employees’ Group
Insurance 368,531,895 369,376,295
Silver State Health Insurance Exchange:
Silver State Health Insurance
Exchange Administration $30,963,195 $31,627,844
Department of Indigent Defense Services:
Office of the State Public
Defender $1,045,514 $1,045,514
Indigent Defense Services 357,351 0
Adjutant General:
Office of the Military $43,318,916 $44,047,604
Adjutant General’s Special
Armory Account 62,873 67,873
Patriot Relief Fund 357,789 273,825
Emergency Operations Center 797,576 649,194
State Active Duty 1,056,642 890,725
Department of Corrections:
Prison Medical Care $2,462,791 $2,462,791
Offenders’ Store Fund 26,240,710 22,480,602
Office of the Director 2,251,559 2,251,559
Correctional Programs 1,514,701 1,542,119
Warm Springs Correctional
Center 3,199 3,199
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Northern Nevada Correctional
Center $178,487 $178,487
Prison Industry 5,930,091 5,914,540
Stewart Conservation Camp 156,206 156,206
Pioche Conservation Camp 17,755 17,755
Northern Nevada Transitional
Housing 723,286 723,286
Three Lakes Valley
Conservation Camp 18,508 18,508
Prison Ranch 3,072,270 3,235,213
Southern Desert Correctional
Center 124,766 124,766
Wells Conservation Camp 737 737
Jean Conservation Camp 11,955 11,955
Ely State Prison 175,051 175,051
Carlin Conservation Camp 9,806 9,806
Lovelock Correctional Center 191,445 191,445
Casa Grande Transitional
Housing 1,128,939 1,128,939
Florence McClure Women’s
Correctional Center 99,374 99,374
High Desert State Prison 159,086 159,086
Inmate Welfare Account 6,358,455 7,743,050
Commission on Mineral Resources:
Division of Minerals $7,046,366 $6,633,633
State Department of Agriculture:
Agriculture
Registration/Enforcement $10,001,529 $11,047,058
Plant Health and Quarantine
Services 58,521 60,634
Livestock Inspection 3,112,899 2,563,404
Veterinary Medical Services 396,643 413,015
Commercial Feed 462,980 527,294
Measurement Standards 9,972,160 9,356,795
Administrative Services 5,425,456 5,573,492
Predatory Animal and Rodent
Control 32,501 32,501
Nutrition Education Programs 204,664,685 204,762,545
Dairy Fund 7,224,752 7,193,808
Commodity Foods
Distribution Program 32,401,621 28,238,934
Livestock Enforcement 409,135 414,740
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Public Utilities Commission of Nevada:
Public Utilities Commission $23,680,561 $23,469,930
Nevada Gaming Control Board:
Gaming Control Board $19,044,781 $19,662,659
Gaming Control Board
Investigation Fund 18,100,080 18,347,788
Department of Public Safety:
Division of Parole and
Probation $11,624,516 $11,957,234
Investigation Division 1,800,210 1,832,621
Training Division 1,550 1,550
State Fire Marshal Division 9,180,393 9,148,760
Cigarette Fire Safe Standard
and Firefighter Support 117,265 117,269
Highway Safety Plan and
Administration 14,980,912 14,961,219
Motorcycle Safety Program 1,385,691 1,441,803
Evidence Vault 1,169,264 1,203,090
Forfeitures – Law
Enforcement 560,686 511,651
NHP K-9 Program 28,441 27,270
Director’s Office 9,615,441 9,740,453
Office of Professional
Responsibility 1,411,310 1,419,241
Justice Assistance Act 2,595,036 2,595,036
Central Repository for Nevada
Records of Criminal
History 16,281,143 18,494,341
Nevada Highway Patrol
Division 6,072,558 6,155,552
Records, Communications and
Compliance Division 8,254,120 9,292,719
Highway Safety Grants
Account 4,234,196 4,316,295
Capitol Police 6,472,027 6,921,758
State Emergency Response
Commission 4,607,529 4,664,553
Justice Assistance Grant Trust
Account 2,363,719 2,356,126
Justice Grant 670,635 649,861
Account for Reentry Programs 5,000 5,000
Colorado River Commission of Nevada:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Colorado River Commission $11,023,109 $11,181,328
Research and Development
Account 15,648,000 15,573,581
Power Delivery Project 43,518,281 33,867,680
Power Marketing Fund 40,354,717 41,427,531
State Department of Conservation and Natural Resources:
DEP – Administration $13,113,983 $15,569,560
DEP – Air Quality 16,260,315 16,797,312
DEP – Water Pollution
Control 10,249,479 9,083,317
DEP – Materials Management
and Corrective Action 25,465,680 25,590,162
DEP – Mining
Regulation/Reclamation 9,085,740 8,693,629
DEP – State Revolving Fund –
Administration 9,011,483 9,021,855
DEP – Water Quality Planning 5,231,711 5,254,773
DEP – Safe Drinking Water
Program 18,347,404 18,030,815
DEP – Industrial Site Cleanup 6,308,724 7,285,661
Division of Natural Heritage 1,544,559 1,573,656
State Environmental
Commission 51,100 51,100
Account for Off-Highway
Vehicles 3,375,625 2,745,913
Conservation and Natural
Resources Administration 5,524,156 5,699,444
DEP – Water Planning Capital
Improvement 17,687 14,166
Water Conservation and
Infrastructure 20,653,426 20,488,213
Division of State Parks 15,506,323 15,673,060
Division of Water Resources 2,719,030 1,722,082
Division of State Lands 529,581 541,111
Division of Forestry 6,373,110 6,414,106
Forest Fire Suppression 8,004,768 7,982,270
Out-of-State Fire Suppression
Account 32,000,000 32,000,000
Forestry Conservation Camps 2,395,268 2,395,268
Office of Historic Preservation 1,318,270 1,321,871
Forestry Nurseries 1,078,689 1,084,344
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Account to Restore the
Sagebrush Ecosystem $1,377,544 $1,305,057
Environmental Quality
Improvement 36,803 36,803
Tahoe Regional Planning Agency:
Tahoe Regional Planning
Agency $19,115,908 $19,115,908
Department of Wildlife:
Director’s Office $12,250,251 $12,584,209
Data and Technology Services 7,955,014 8,121,620
Conservation Education 5,749,060 5,792,524
Law Enforcement 9,973,615 9,989,193
Game Management 12,739,195 12,315,456
Fisheries Management 11,093,719 10,948,762
Biodiversity Division 2,162,628 2,180,467
Habitat 16,244,757 16,296,953
Department of Business and Industry:
Nevada Attorney for Injured
Workers $5,344,685 $5,336,628
Government Employee-
Management Relations
Board 896,636 873,829
New Markets Performance
Guarantee Account 6,093,691 435,690
Financial Institutions
Investigations 2,265,216 2,332,118
Insurance Regulation 28,335,136 25,999,958
Common-Interest
Communities 8,821,938 8,032,710
Insurance Recovery 209,320 209,320
Real Estate Administration 2,591,185 2,593,029
Real Estate Education,
Research and Recovery
Fund 2,154,197 2,008,360
Technology Account 756,405 924,468
Division of Financial
Institutions 14,032,106 13,543,592
Account for Affordable
Housing 80,903,635 83,200,253
Special Housing Assistance 2,836,172 3,590,405
Home Means Nevada
Initiative 155,699,258 71,060,460
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Housing Division $8,165,865 $8,077,283
Windsor Park 13,565,000 435,000
Supportive Housing
Development 32,136,238 24,455,131
Housing Inspection and
Compliance 8,894,947 8,151,743
Financial Institutions Audit 526,144 498,918
Division of Mortgage Lending 21,569,642 19,814,971
Nevada Transportation
Authority 4,421,225 4,470,494
Transportation Authority
Administrative Fines 1,728,217 1,799,139
Taxicab Authority 9,034,635 8,028,136
Division of Industrial
Relations 11,638,137 11,690,217
Business and Industry
Administration 8,271,148 8,771,793
Occupational Safety and
Health Enforcement 23,900,571 24,320,322
Private Activity Bonds 2,357,603 2,304,127
Self-Insured Workers’
Compensation 881,761 891,507
Safety Consultation and
Training 4,922,717 4,986,275
Mine Safety and Training 2,576,042 2,606,135
Weatherization 17,505,238 19,097,514
Office of Nevada Boards,
Commissions and Councils
Standards 706,403 1,436,718
Department of Transportation:
Transportation Administration $968,176,562 $978,952,766
Bond Construction 161,600,000 161,600,000
Wildlife Crossings 5,000,000 4,000,000
Department of Motor Vehicles:
Records Search $13,268,832 $13,855,748
Division of Information
Technology 6,841,996 7,140,993
Department Transformation
Effort 1,000 1,000
Motor Carrier Division 2,787,077 2,911,898
Motor Vehicle Pollution
Control 13,795,255 14,135,767
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Verification of Insurance $20,541,919 $21,644,225
Hearings Office 2,490 2,490
Division of Customer Services 62,651,820 64,248,271
Division of Compliance
Enforcement 410,817 410,767
Office of the Director 3,259,605 3,488,875
Fiscal Operations Division 8,546,287 8,674,574
License Plate Factory 6,121,532 5,761,334
Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation:
Nevada Equal Rights
Commission $415,000 $415,000
Blind Business Enterprise
Program 6,790,187 6,641,367
Bureau of Services to Persons
Who Are Blind or Visually
Impaired 3,829,542 3,899,092
Bureau of Vocational
Rehabilitation 30,248,262 31,592,698
Rehabilitation Administration 2,116,997 2,186,581
Disability Adjudication 30,181,487 31,076,208
Administration 8,232,322 8,449,036
Research and Analysis 3,538,914 3,597,740
Information Technology
Division 23,128,427 22,645,051
Workforce Development 139,629,328 137,587,779
Employment Security Division
Administration 1,849,473 1,867,113
Unemployment Insurance 40,439,165 38,615,212
Employment Security Fund 54,420,947 47,477,396
Commission on Postsecondary
Education 194,679 194,773
Governor’s Office of
Workforce Innovation 1,360,899 1,156,249
Public Employees’ Retirement System:
Public Employees’ Retirement
System $31,754,253 $21,789,890
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby authorized for expenditure from
the money received by the State of Nevada pursuant to any
settlement entered into by the State of Nevada and a manufacturer of
tobacco products or recovered by the State of Nevada from a
judgment in a civil action against a manufacturer of tobacco
products the sum of $444,746 for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
sum of $448,595 for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to support the tobacco
enforcement operations of the Attorney General Office’s Special
Litigation budget account and the sum of $602,353 for Fiscal Year
2025-2026 and the sum of $605,003 for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to
support the tobacco enforcement operations of the Attorney General
Office’s Investigations Unit budget account.
2. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary,
upon receipt of sufficient money by the State of Nevada pursuant to
any settlement entered into by the State of Nevada and a
manufacturer of tobacco products or recovered by the State of
Nevada from a judgment in a civil action against a manufacturer of
tobacco products, the State Controller shall:
(a) Disburse, on or after July 1, 2025, the money authorized for
expenditure by subsection 1 in its entirety for Fiscal Year 2025-
2026 before other disbursements required by law are made;
(b) Disburse, on or after July 1, 2026, the money authorized for
expenditure by subsection 1 in its entirety for Fiscal Year 2026-
2027 before other disbursements required by law are made; and
(c) Thereafter in each fiscal year, disburse all other money
authorized for expenditure from this same source in the manner
provided in NRS 439.630.
3. Any balance of the sums authorized for expenditure by
subsection 1 remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must
be disbursed as soon as all payments of money committed have been
made as follows: 40 percent to the Millennium Scholarship Trust
Fund created by NRS 396.926 and 60 percent to the Fund for a
Healthy Nevada created by NRS 439.620.
4. Any money authorized for expenditure in section 1 of this
act that originated from the Fund for a Healthy Nevada remaining at
the end of the respective fiscal years must be disbursed to the Fund
for a Healthy Nevada as soon as all payments of money committed
have been made.
Sec. 3. 1. Expenditure of $44,332,502 by the Nevada
Gaming Control Board from the State General Fund pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 463.330 is hereby authorized during Fiscal Year
2025-2026.
2. Expenditure of $43,916,793 by the Nevada Gaming Control
Board from the State General Fund pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 463.330 is hereby authorized during Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
3. Any balance of the sums authorized by subsections 1 and 2
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the Nevada Gaming Control Board or any entity to which
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
money from the authorization is granted or otherwise transferred in
any manner, and any portion of the balance remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 18, 2026, and September 17,
2027, respectively, by either the Nevada Gaming Control Board or
the entity to which money from the authorization was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027,
respectively.
Sec. 4. 1. Expenditure of $663,726 by the Nevada Gaming
Commission from the State General Fund pursuant to the provisions
of NRS 463.330 is hereby authorized during Fiscal Year 2025-2026.
2. Expenditure of $647,638 by the Nevada Gaming
Commission from the State General Fund pursuant to the provisions
of NRS 463.330 is hereby authorized during Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
3. Any balance of the sums authorized by subsections 1 and 2
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the Nevada Gaming Commission or any entity to which
money from the authorization is granted or otherwise transferred in
any manner, and any portion of the balance remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 18, 2026, and September 17,
2027, respectively, by either the Nevada Gaming Commission or the
entity to which money from the authorization was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027,
respectively.
Sec. 5. The money authorized to be expended by the
provisions of sections 1 to 4, inclusive, of this act, except for
expenditures by the Legislative and Judicial Departments of the
State Government, the Public Employees’ Retirement System and
the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency, must be expended in
accordance with the allotment, transfer, work program and budget
provisions of NRS 353.150 to 353.246, inclusive, and transfers to
and from salary allotments, travel allotments, operating expense
allotments, equipment allotments and other allotments must be
allowed and made in accordance with the provisions of NRS
353.215 to 353.225, inclusive, and after separate consideration of
the merits of each request.
Sec. 6. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 and
section 7 of this act, and in accordance with the provisions of NRS
353.220, the Chief of the Budget Division of the Office of Finance
in the Office of the Governor may, with the approval of the
Governor, authorize the augmentation of the amounts authorized in
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
sections 1 to 4, inclusive, of this act for expenditure by a given
officer, department, board, agency, commission and institution from
any other state agency, from any agency of local government or of
the Federal Government, or from any other source which the Chief
determines is in excess of the amount so taken into consideration by
this act. The Chief of the Budget Division of the Office of Finance
in the Office of the Governor shall reduce any authorization
whenever the Chief determines that money to be received will be
less than the amounts authorized in sections 1 to 4, inclusive, of this
act.
2. The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau may, with
the approval of the Legislative Commission, authorize the
augmentation of the amount authorized in section 1 of this act to
the Legislative Fund and the State Printing Fund for expenditure by
the Legislative Counsel Bureau from any source which the Director
determines is in excess of the amount so taken into consideration by
this act. The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau shall reduce
the authorization whenever the Director determines that money to be
received will be less than the amount so authorized in section 1 of
this act.
Sec. 7. 1. Except as otherwise provided in sections 8, 11, 12,
13, 14, 16, 17 and 23 of this act and subsection 3 of section 9 of this
act, where the operation of an office, department, board, agency,
commission, institution or program is financed during the 2025-
2027 biennium by an appropriation or appropriations from the State
General Fund or the State Highway Fund, as well as by money
received from other sources, the portion provided by appropriation
from the State General Fund or the State Highway Fund must be
decreased to the extent that the receipts of the money from other
sources is exceeded, unless:
(a) Such a decrease jeopardizes the receipts of the money from
those other sources.
(b) Upon recommendation of the Governor, the office,
department, board, agency, commission, institution or program
requests and is granted an exemption by the Interim Finance
Committee from the requirements of this subsection for all or a
portion of the excess appropriated money. An exemption granted by
the Interim Finance Committee pursuant to this paragraph applies
only to the appropriated money for which the exemption was
granted and only to the fiscal year for which the exemption was
granted.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
2. In acting upon a request for an exemption pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1, the Interim Finance Committee shall
consider, among other things:
(a) The reason provided for the exemption, including, without
limitation, the current need for the excess appropriated money; and
(b) The intent of the Legislature in approving the budget for the
current biennium.
Sec. 8. 1. The Nevada System of Higher Education may
expend the following fees and tuition collected from the registration
of students, resident or nonresident:
Fiscal Year Fiscal Year
2025-2026 2026-2027
University of Nevada, Reno $119,813,215 $126,048,682
University of Nevada, Las Vegas 165,094,452 175,073,781
College of Southern Nevada 49,191,660 52,020,472
Western Nevada College 5,139,824 5,242,620
Truckee Meadows Community
College 15,538,264 16,362,368
Great Basin College 5,514,706 5,779,639
Nevada State University 15,348,119 16,457,119
UNLV Dental School 9,634,779 10,122,400
UNLV Law School 7,196,842 7,570,579
UNR School of Medicine 7,948,640 8,071,234
UNLV School of Medicine 5,794,606 6,097,297
Prison Education Program 182,169 187,650
2. The Nevada System of Higher Education may expend any
additional registration fees and any additional nonresident tuition
fees collected from students as a result of registering additional
students beyond the budgeted enrollments. The Nevada System of
Higher Education may also expend any additional registration fees
and nonresident tuition fees resulting from the imposition of fee
increases. The Nevada System of Higher Education shall report to
the Interim Finance Committee on a biannual basis within 60 days
after each reporting period, with the first reporting period to cover
July 1, 2025, to December 31, 2025, any additional registration fees
and any additional nonresident tuition fees received by each
institution beyond the authorized amounts in subsection 1, including
identification of the expenditures funded through the additional fees.
3. The Nevada System of Higher Education may expend
academic support payments of $28,106,668 in Fiscal Year 2025-
2026 and $28,106,668 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 and may also
expend any additional academic support payments resulting from
additional academic partners beyond the budgeted amounts.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
4. At the close of Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, the amounts authorized for the Nevada System of Higher
Education, as provided in section 1 of this act, shall be considered
cumulatively for each budget account. Authorized revenues received
within each budget account that do not exceed the amount included
in section 1 of this act, combined with authorized amounts approved
by the Board of Regents of the University of Nevada and the Office
of Finance in the Office of the Governor, if applicable, must not be
utilized to decrease appropriations from the State General Fund
when determining whether a reversion to the State General Fund is
required at the close of Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year
2026-2027.
Sec. 9. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and
3, the State Public Defender shall collect not more than the
following amounts from the counties for the use of his or her
services:
Fiscal Year Fiscal Year
2025-2026 2026-2027
Humboldt County $567,217 $595,578
White Pine County 530,572 557,100
Totals 1,097,789 1,152,678
2. The State Public Defender may assess and collect, from the
counties, their pro rata share of any salary benefit or cost of living
increases approved by the 83rd Session of the Nevada Legislature
for employees of the Office of State Public Defender for Fiscal Year
2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
3. If any county chooses to contribute an additional amount,
the State Public Defender may, with the approval of the Interim
Finance Committee, accept it and apply it to augment his or her
services.
Sec. 10. In Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027,
the State Treasurer shall allocate the amount of tax on motor vehicle
fuel computed pursuant to NRS 365.535, to be paid on fuel used in
watercraft for recreational purposes, equally between the
Department of Wildlife and the Division of State Parks of the State
Department of Conservation and Natural Resources.
Sec. 11. Money authorized for expenditure in section 1 of this
act by the State Department of Conservation and Natural Resources
for the Division of Forestry, the Forestry Conservation Camps and
the Forest Fire Suppression budget accounts for the costs of repair
and maintenance of fire-fighting and emergency response vehicles
may be expended for that purpose.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
Sec. 12. Money authorized for expenditure in section 1 of this
act by the State Department of Conservation and Natural Resources
for the Division of Forestry and Forest Fire Suppression budget
accounts for the support of the incident business unit may be
expended for that purpose.
Sec. 13. Money authorized for expenditure in section 1 of this
act by the State Department of Conservation and Natural Resources
for the Forest Fire Suppression budget account for the support of the
incident business unit and up to $425,000 for the repair and
maintenance of fire-fighting and emergency response vehicles that
remains unexpended on June 30 of Fiscal Year 2025-2026 or Fiscal
Year 2026-2027 may be carried forward to the next fiscal year for
those purposes.
Sec. 14. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education Loans and
Stipends budget account may balance forward to the subsequent
fiscal year for expenditure on Health Profession Education Program
slots any unobligated loan, stipend and interest repayment revenues
authorized by section 1 of this act which are received after May 15
of each fiscal year in the 2025-2027 biennium.
Sec. 15. Money deposited in the Emergency Operations
Center budget account of the Office of the Military is restricted to
the uses specified, and the unexpended balance of that money on
June 30 of Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027 may
be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
Sec. 16. If the Division of Child and Family Services of the
Department of Human Services or Clark County or Washoe County
receives an additional amount of money from sources other than the
State General Fund during Fiscal Year 2025-2026 or Fiscal Year
2026-2027, the Division or County may, with the approval of the
Interim Finance Committee, accept the money and apply it to
augment child welfare services. This section does not apply to
Medicaid funding received, directly or indirectly, as a result of a
state plan option related to specialized foster care.
Sec. 17. Money authorized for expenditure in section 8 of this
act for the Nevada System of Higher Education that remains
unexpended on June 30 of either fiscal year may be carried forward
to the next fiscal year for the authorized purposes.
Sec. 18. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 4 of
NRS 353.220, the approval of the Interim Finance Committee is not
required for any request for the revision of a work program for the
Municipal Bond Bank Revenue or Municipal Bond Bank Debt
Service budget account of the Office of the State Treasurer. This
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
section only applies to the bond repayment costs of the bonds from
the budget accounts prescribed in this section. As used in this
section, “bond repayment costs” means the principal, interest and
related costs of the issuance of the bonds and any other costs related
to the payment of the bonds or compliance with covenants made in
connection with those bonds, as estimated by the State Treasurer.
Sec. 19. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 334.040, if
the Fleet Services Division of the Department of Administration
sells a retired vehicle during the 2025-2027 biennium that was
purchased with money from an appropriation from the State General
Fund, the revenue from such a sale must be deposited in the State
General Fund.
Sec. 20. 1. The Public Employees’ Benefits Program shall
comply with the provisions of NRS 353.220 when projecting
funding available in excess of projected budgeted expenditures.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 353.220, the Public
Employees’ Benefits Program, including, without limitation, the
Board of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program, shall not expend
or otherwise obligate any reserves, either realized or projected, in
excess of the amounts authorized in section 1 of this act for
purposes of changing the health benefits, including, without
limitation, reducing or off-setting participant premiums, available to
state and nonstate active employees, retirees and covered
dependents over the 2025-2027 biennium without approval of the
Interim Finance Committee and upon the recommendation of the
Governor.
Sec. 21. The Board of Directors of the Nevada State
Infrastructure Bank is authorized to use money in the Nevada State
Infrastructure Bank Fund created pursuant to NRS 226.787 during
any fiscal year during the 2025-2027 biennium from:
1. The payment of interest earned on a loan or other financial
assistance provided to a qualified borrower by the Nevada State
Infrastructure Bank;
2. Interest earned on money on deposit in the Nevada State
Infrastructure Bank Fund; and
3. Fees and charges imposed and collected by the Nevada State
Infrastructure Bank in connection with the activities of the Bank,
including, without limitation, origination fees on a loan or other
financial assistance provided to a qualified borrower by the Bank,
 to carry out the statutory purposes and powers of the Bank
pursuant to NRS 226.700 to 226.832, inclusive, and to pay
administrative costs of the Bank, including, without limitation,
personnel and operating expenditures of the Bank.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
Sec. 22. It is the intent of the Legislature that the amounts
authorized in section 1 of this act for the Nevada Medicaid and the
Nevada Check-Up Program budget accounts of the Nevada Health
Authority must be expended in such a manner as to continue the
current service delivery model for prescription drugs in which
persons who are enrolled in a Medicaid or Check-Up managed care
program receive prescription drugs through a Medicaid managed
care organization in the 2025-2027 biennium.
Sec. 23. In addition to the amounts authorized for expenditure
in section 1 of this act, if the Division of Child and Family Services
of the Department of Human Services receives additional money not
appropriated from the State General Fund or the State Highway
Fund during Fiscal Year 2025-2026 or Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for
the Victims of Crime budget account, the Division may accept the
money in accordance with chapter 353 of NRS to support the
Victims of Crime budget account.
Sec. 24. Money authorized for expenditure in section 1 of this
act by the Commission on Ethics for the replacement of its case
management system in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year
2026-2027 is available for expenditure in either fiscal year for the
approved purpose.
Sec. 25. If the name of an officer or agency has been changed
or the responsibilities of an officer or agency have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of another act enacted by the 83rd Session
of the Nevada Legislature and approved by the Governor and the
change in name or transfer of duties is not indicated in this act, any
reference to that officer or agency in this act shall be deemed to
refer to the officer or agency the name of which or duties of which
have been changed or transferred by the other act.
Sec. 26. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 218D.430 and
218D.435, a committee may vote on this act before the expiration of
the period prescribed for the return of a fiscal note in NRS
218D.475. This section applies retroactively from and after May 18,
2025.
Sec. 27. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)